Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1857YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 50 Section 1. Section 321P.8, Code 2025, is amended by striking 1 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 321P.8 Use of moneys from citations. 3 1. Moneys received by a local authority from citations 4 issued using a system that exceed the amount necessary to 5 operate, use, maintain, and administer such system shall be 6 transferred monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited in 7 the road use tax fund created in section 312.1. 8 2. Each month, a local authority that received moneys from 9 citations issued using a system shall submit a report to the 10 department containing a full and complete statement of all 11 moneys received by and expenses paid relating to the system 12 during the preceding calendar month. 13